apertium-panm/apertium-pan.pan_Guru.dix
<?xml version="1.0" encoding="UTF-8"?>
<dictionary>
  <alphabet>ਅਆਇਈਉਊਏਐਓਔਕਚਟਤਪਯ੍ਸ਼ਰਫਥਠਛਖਗਘਙਖ਼ਗ਼ਞਝਜਠਛਠਡਢਣੜਲ਼ਨਧਦਬਭਮਫ਼ਜ਼ੵਵਲਰਸ਼ਸਹੑ਼ਾੀੂੈੌੋੁਿੰੱਁਂਃ੧੨੩੪੫੬੯੮੭੦☬ੴ॥।</alphabet>

  <sdefs>
    <sdef n="n"       c="Noun"/>
  	<sdef n="np"      c="Proper noun"/>
  	<sdef n="ant"     c="Anthroponym"/>
    <sdef n="post"    c="PostPosition"/>
    <sdef n="prn"     c="Pronoun"/>
    <sdef n="pers"    c="Personal"/>
    <sdef n="adj"     c="Adjective"/>
    <sdef n="fut"    c="Future"/>
    <sdef n="imp"    c="Imperative"/>
    <sdef n="gna"    c="verbal adverb"/>
    <sdef n="inj"     c="Interjection"/>
    <sdef n="agnt"    c="agentive"/>
    <sdef n="inf"     c="Infinitive"/>     
  	<sdef n="frm"	  c="formal"/>
    <sdef n="pri"    c="present indicative"/>	 	 
    <sdef n="cnjcoo"  c="Co-ordinating conjunction"/>     
    <sdef n="cnjsub"  c="Sub-ordinating conjunction"/>        
    <sdef n="cnjun"   c="Undecided conjunction"/>  
    <sdef n="adv"     c="Adverb"/>
    <sdef n="cnjadv"   c="Adverbial conjunction"/>        
    <sdef n="mf"      c="Both Genders"/>
    <sdef n="m"       c="Masculine"/>
    <sdef n="f"       c="Feminine"/>
    <sdef n="sg"      c="Singular"/>
    <sdef n="pl"      c="Plural"/>

    <sdef n="nom"     c="Direct/Nominative"/>
    <sdef n="obl"     c="Oblique"/>
    <sdef n="dat"     c="Dative"/>
    <sdef n="abl"     c="Ablative"/>
    <sdef n="voc"     c="Vocative"/>
    <sdef n="loc"     c="Locative"/>

    <sdef n="p1"      c=""/>
    <sdef n="p2"      c=""/>
    <sdef n="p3"      c=""/>
  
    <sdef n="ord"     c="ordinal"/>
    <sdef n="num"     c="number/cardinal"/>

    <sdef n="vblex"     c="Verb"/>
    <sdef n="vaux"    c=""/>     
    <sdef n="vbser"   c="Verb 'to be'"/>     
    <sdef n="impf"    c=" Imperfective participle"/>
    <sdef n="pres"    c="Present tense"/> 
    <sdef n="iv"     c="intransitive"/>
    <sdef n="tv"     c="transitive"/> 	
    <sdef n="prs"    c="Subjunctive"/>
    <sdef n="perf"     c="Perfective participle"/> 
    <sdef n="aa"      c="Animate"/>
    <sdef n="nn"      c="Inanimate"/>       
    <sdef n="itg"     c="Interrogative"/>      

    <sdef n="cm"         c="Comma"/>
    <sdef n="sent"       c="Sentence marker"/>
    <sdef n="lpar"       c="Left parenthesis"/>
    <sdef n="rpar"       c="Right parenthesis"/>
    <sdef n="lquot"      c="Left quote"/>
    <sdef n="rquot"      c="Right quote"/>
    <sdef n="guio"       c="Hyphen"/>

    <sdef n="prox"     c="Proximate"/>
    <sdef n="dist"     c="Distant"/>          
    <sdef n="dem"     c="Demonstrative"/>
    <sdef n="ins"      c="instrumental"/>
    <sdef n="erg"     c="Ergative"/>        
    <sdef n="gen"     c="Genitive"/> 
    <sdef n="stem"  c="stem"/>


    <sdef n="mfn"/>
    <sdef n="sp"      c=""/>        

  </sdefs>

  <pardefs>

  <!-- SECTION: Paradigms -->

  <!-- SECTION: Paradigm Nouns -->     
    
    <pardef n="ਜੇਮਜ਼__np">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef> 

  <!-- SECTION: Postpositions -->  

    <!-- genitives -->
    <pardef n="__gen_endings">
        <e><p><l>ਦਾ</l><r>ਦਾ<s n="gen"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ਦੇ</l><r>ਦਾ<s n="gen"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ਦੀ</l><r>ਦਾ<s n="gen"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ਦੀ</l><r>ਦਾ<s n="gen"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- basic postpositions -->
    <pardef n="case">
      <e><p><l>ਨੂੰ</l><r>ਨੂੰ<s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਨੇ</l><r>ਨੇ<s n="erg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਤੋਂ</l><r>ਤੋਂ<s n="abl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਵਿਚ</l><r>ਵਿਚ<s n="post"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਤੇ</l><r>ਤੇ<s n="post"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਤਕ</l><r>ਤਕ<s n="post"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r></r></p><par n="__gen_endings"/></e>
    </pardef> 

	<!-- SECTION: Numerals -->

    <pardef n="ਪਹਿਲਾ__ord">
      <e><p><l>ਾ</l><r>ਾ<s n="num"/><s n="ord"/><s n ="m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ੀ</l><r>ਾ<s n="num"/><s n="ord"/><s n ="f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ੇ</l><r>ਾ<s n="num"/><s n="ord"/><s n ="mf"/></r></p></e>

    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ਚੁਰੰਜ੍ਹਵਾਂ__ord">
      <e><p><l>ਾਂ</l><r><s n="num"/><s n="ord"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ੇਂ</l><r><s n="num"/><s n="ord"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ੀਂ</l><r><s n="num"/><s n="ord"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ੀਂ</l><r><s n="num"/><s n="ord"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ਹਜ਼ਾਰਵਾਂ__ord">
      <e><p><l>ਾਂ</l><r><s n="num"/><s n="ord"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ੇਂ</l><r><s n="num"/><s n="ord"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ੀਂ</l><r><s n="num"/><s n="ord"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ੀਂ</l><r><s n="num"/><s n="ord"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ੀਆਂ</l><r><s n="num"/><s n="ord"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ੀਆਂ</l><r><s n="num"/><s n="ord"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ਸੱਤ__num">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਵਾਂ</l><r><s n="num"/><s n="ord"/><s n ="m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਵੀਂ</l><r><s n="num"/><s n="ord"/><s n ="f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਵੇਂ</l><r><s n="num"/><s n="ord"/><s n ="mf"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਾਂ</l><r><s n="num"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ਪੰਦਰਾਂ__num">
      <e><p><l>ਾਂ</l><r><s n="num"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>੍ਹੀਂ</l><r><s n="num"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ਸੌ__num">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="num"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="num"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ਸੈਂਤੀ__num">
      <e><p><l>ੀ</l><r><s n="num"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>੍ਹੀਆਂ</l><r><s n="num"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>੍ਹੀਂ</l><r><s n="num"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ਬਵੰਜਾ__num">
      <e><p><l>ਾ</l><r><s n="num"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>੍ਹਾਂ</l><r><s n="num"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>੍ਹੀਂ</l><r><s n="num"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ਤਿੰਨ__num">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>

    </pardef>

    <e lm="ਗਿਰਜਾ"><i>ਗਿਰਜਾ</i><par n="ਜੇਮਜ਼__np"/></e>
    <e lm="ਦਾ"><i></i><par n="__gen_endings"/></e>
    <e lm="ਚੁਰੰਜ੍ਹਵਾਂ"><i>ਚੁਰੰਜ੍ਹਵ</i><par n="ਚੁਰੰਜ੍ਹਵਾਂ__ord"/></e>
    <e lm="ਹਜ਼ਾਰਵਾਂ"><i>ਹਜ਼ਾਰਵ</i><par n="ਹਜ਼ਾਰਵਾਂ__ord"/></e>
    <e lm="ਪੰਦਰਾਂ"><i>ਪੰਦਰ</i><par n="ਪੰਦਰਾਂ__num"/></e>
    <e lm="ਸੌ"><i>ਸੌ</i><par n="ਸੌ__num"/></e>
    <e lm="ਸੈਂਤੀ"><i>ਸੈਂਤ</i><par n="ਸੈਂਤੀ__num"/></e>
    <e lm="ਬਵੰਜਾ"><i>ਬਵੰਜ</i><par n="ਬਵੰਜਾ__num"/></e>
    <e lm="ਤਿੰਨ"><i>ਤਿੰਨ</i><par n="ਤਿੰਨ__num"/></e>
    <e lm="ਸੱਤ"><i>ਸੱਤ</i><par n="ਸੱਤ__num"/></e>
    <e lm="ਇੱਕ"><i>ਇੱਕ</i><par n="ਸੱਤ__num"/></e>
    <e lm="ਦੋ"><i>ਦੋ</i><par n="ਸੱਤ__num"/></e>
    <e lm="ਪਹਿਲਾ"><i>ਪਹਿਲ</i><par n="ਪਹਿਲਾ__ord"/></e>
